South Dakota, session 2026, HB1010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-26-47.1 be AMENDED:
32-26-47.1. No person may operate a motor vehicle while using a mobile
electronic device. A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
This section does not apply to:
(1) A law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, paramedic,
operator of an authorized emergency vehicle, or similarly engaged paid or
volunteer public safety first responder during the performance of that person's
official duties, and a public utility employee or contractor acting within the scope
of that person's employment;
(2) The use of a mobile electronic device for emergency the following purposes,
including:
(a) Using a text messaging device to contact a 911 system,;
(b) Placing an emergency call to a law enforcement agency, health care
provider, fire department, or other emergency services agency or entity, or
to report;
(c) Reporting to appropriate authorities a fire, traffic accident, serious road
hazard, or medical or hazardous materials emergency, or to report;
(d) Reporting the operator of another motor vehicle who is driving in a reckless
or otherwise unsafe manner, or who appears to be driving under the
influence of alcohol or drugs, or to report; or
(e) Reporting a crime;
(3) The use of a global positioning or navigation system feature of a mobile electronic
device, but does apply to provided the operator of the motor vehicle is not manually
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.516.10 2 1010
entering information into the global positioning or navigation system feature of the
device; or
(4) Reading, selecting, or entering a telephone number or name in a mobile electronic
device for the purpose of making or receiving a telephone call and using the device
for the call, or if a person otherwise activates or deactivates a feature or function
of a mobile electronic device; or
(5) The use of a mobile electronic device in a voice-operated or hands-free mode if the
operator of the motor vehicle does not use the operator's hands to operate the
device, except to tap or in some other manner, activate or deactivate a feature or
function of the device.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.